Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.410

Underground electric and communication facilities, installation or conversion to—Declaration of public interest and purpose.

It is hereby found and declared that the conversion of overhead electric and communication facilities to underground facilities and the initial underground installation of such facilities is substantially beneficial to the public safety and welfare, is in the public interest and is a public purpose, notwithstanding any resulting incidental private benefit to any electric or communication utility affected by such conversion or installation.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 103 s 1; 1967 c 194 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 c 194: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1967 c 194 s 9.]

Cities and towns, conversion of overhead electric and communication facilities to underground facilities: Chapter 35.96 RCW.